test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_kiela_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# ok

Tests:

  Noun - suonâ:
    suonâ+N+Sg+Nom: suonâ
    suonâ+N+Sg+Gen: suonâ
    suonâ+N+Sg+Acc: suonâ
    suonâ+N+Sg+Ill: suonân
    suonâ+N+Sg+Loc: suonâst
    suonâ+N+Sg+Com: suonáin
    suonâ+N+Sg+Abe: suonâttáá
    suonâ+N+Ess: suonnân
    suonâ+N+Par: suonnâd
    suonâ+N+Pl+Nom: suonah
    suonâ+N+Pl+Gen: [suonâi, suonâi]
    suonâ+N+Pl+Acc: suonâid
    suonâ+N+Pl+Ill: suonáid 
    suonâ+N+Pl+Loc: suonâin
    suonâ+N+Pl+Com: suonâiguin
    suonâ+N+Pl+Abe: suonâittáá

  Noun - muorâ:
    muorâ+N+Sg+Nom: muorâ
    muorâ+N+Sg+Gen: muorâ
    muorâ+N+Sg+Acc: muorâ
    muorâ+N+Sg+Ill: muorân
    muorâ+N+Sg+Loc: muorâst
    muorâ+N+Sg+Com: muoráin
    muorâ+N+Sg+Abe: muorâttáá
    muorâ+N+Ess: muorrân
    muorâ+N+Par: muorrâd
    muorâ+N+Pl+Nom: muorah
    muorâ+N+Pl+Gen: [muorâi, muorâi]
    muorâ+N+Pl+Acc: muorâid
    muorâ+N+Pl+Ill: muoráid 
    muorâ+N+Pl+Loc: muorâin
    muorâ+N+Pl+Com: muorâiguin
    muorâ+N+Pl+Abe: muorâittáá
